Maryland, session 2026, HB1308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–104.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1308*

HOUSE BILL 1308
(14) (i) “Total real property tax” means the product of the sum of all
property tax rates on real property, including special district tax rates, for the taxable year
on a dwelling, multiplied by the lesser of:
1. [$300,000] $480,000; or
2. the assessed value of the dwelling reduced by the amount
of any assessment on which a property tax credit is granted under § 9–105 of this subtitle.
(ii) “Total real property tax” does not include any adjustment for any
other property tax credit under this title claimed against the property tax imposed on the
dwelling.
(e) (1) On or before May 1 of each year, the Department shall provide the
Comptroller information identifying owners of residential properties with an assessed
value not exceeding [$300,000] $480,000 who, during the preceding 3 years, failed to claim
the property tax credit under this section.
(g) (1) Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, the property tax
credit under this section is the total real property tax of a dwelling, less the percentage of
the combined income of the homeowner that is described in paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(2) The percentage is:
(i) 0% of the 1st [$8,000] $12,500 of combined income;
(ii) 4% of the next [$4,000] $6,500 of combined income;
(iii) 6.5% of the next [$4,000] $6,500 of combined income; and
(iv) 9% of the combined income over [$16,000] $25,500.
(j) (1) A property tax credit under this section may not be granted to a
homeowner whose combined net worth exceeds [$200,000] $320,000 as of December 31 of
the calendar year that precedes the year in which the homeowner applies for the property
tax credit or whose combined gross income exceeds [$60,000] $95,000 in that same
calendar year.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.